Washington statutes.
RCW 41.54.090

Benefits under chapter—Lump sum payment.

(1) The systems may pay a dual member a lump sum payment in lieu of a monthly benefit if the initial monthly benefit computed in accordance with RCW 41.54.030 would be less than fifty dollars. The lump sum payment shall be the greater of the actuarial equivalent of such monthly benefits or an amount equal to the individual's accumulated contributions plus accrued interest.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature that any member who receives a settlement under this section shall be deemed to be retired from the system making the lump sum payment.

[ 1988 c 195 s 6.]